apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂਗੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋਗੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋਗੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂਗੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂਗੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਣਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਣਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਕਰ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਕੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਬੈਠ"><i>ਬੈਠ</i><par n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਲ"><i>ਚਲ</i><par n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਫਫਕ"><i>ਫਫਕ</i><par n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭਰ"><i>ਭਰ</i><par n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੜ"><i>ਪੜ</i><par n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਹੁੰਚ"><i>ਪਹੁੰਚ</i><par n="ਬੈਠ__vblex_iv"/></e>
